California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1128, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative July 1, 1993, by Sec. 15 of Ch. 1128.)
-------------------------------------------

10750.

This chapter shall not apply to a health benefit plan that is subject to Chapter 8.01 (commencing with Section 10753) or Chapter 8.02 (commencing with Section 10755), except as otherwise provided in those chapters.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 13.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Stop-Loss Insurance [10752. - 10752.8.]

10752.

As used in this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Attachment point” means the amount of health claims incurred by a small employer in a policy year for its employees and their dependents, and covered by a stop-loss insurance policy, above which the stop-loss insurer incurs a liability for payment.

(1) “Individual attachment point” means the amount of health claims incurred by a small employer in a policy year for an individual employee or dependent of an employee, and covered by a stop-loss insurance policy, above which the stop-loss insurer incurs a liability for payment, under individual stop-loss coverage. For purposes of this article,
 “specific attachment point” has the same meaning as “individual attachment point.”

(2) “Aggregate attachment point” means the total amount of health claims incurred by a small employer in a policy year for all covered employees and their dependents, and covered by a stop-loss insurance policy, above which the stop-loss insurer incurs a liability for payment under aggregate stop-loss coverage.

(b) “Dependent” means the spouse, registered domestic partner as described in Section 297 of the Family Code, or child of an employee.

(c) “Direct coverage” means that an insurance company assumes a direct obligation to an employee under an insurance policy to pay or indemnify the employee for health claims incurred by the employee or the employee’s dependents.

(d) “Expected claims” means, for the purposes of aggregate stop-loss coverage, the total amount of health claims that is projected to be incurred by a small employer for its employees and their dependents in a policy year.

(e) “Policy year” means the 12-month period that is designated as the policy year or policy period for the stop-loss insurance policy. If the stop-loss insurance policy does not designate a policy year, the policy year is the year in which the total amount of health claims incurred by a small employer for an individual employee or dependent of an employee, or the aggregate amount for all covered employees and their dependents, are added together for the purposes of determining whether the claims have exceeded the attachment point.

(f) “Small employer” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (q) of Section 10753.

(g) “Stop-loss insurer” means an insurance company providing individual or aggregate stop-loss insurance coverage, or both, or any other assumption of risk, to a small employer for the health claims it incurs for its employees and their dependents.

(h) “Stop-loss insurance policy” means a policy, contract, certificate, or statement of coverage between a stop-loss insurer and small employer providing individual or aggregate stop-loss insurance coverage, or both, or any other assumption of risk, to a small employer for the liability the small employer incurs related to the covered health claims of its employees and their dependents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.1.

A stop-loss insurer shall not exclude any employee or dependent on the basis of an actual or expected health status-related factor. Health status-related factors include, but are not limited to, any of the following: health status; medical condition, including both physical and mental illnesses; claims experience; medical history; receipt of health care; genetic information; disability; evidence of insurability, including conditions arising out of acts of domestic violence of the employee or dependent; or any other health status-related factor as determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.2.

A stop-loss insurer shall renew, at the option of the small employer, all stop-loss insurance policies written, issued, administered, or renewed on or after January 1, 2014, and all small employer stop-loss insurance policies in force on or after January 1, 2014, except as follows:

(a) (1) For nonpayment of the required premiums by the small employer, if the small employer has been duly notified and billed for the charge and at least a 30-day grace period has elapsed since the date of notification.

(2) A stop-loss insurer shall continue to provide coverage as required by the small employer’s policy during the grace period described in
 paragraph (1). Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect or impair the small employer’s or the stop-loss insurer’s other rights and responsibilities pursuant to the policy.

(b) Where the stop-loss insurer demonstrates fraud or an intentional misrepresentation of material fact by the small employer under the terms of the stop-loss insurance policy.

(c) Where the stop-loss insurer has been determined by the commissioner to be financially impaired.

(d) Where the stop-loss insurer ceases to write, issue, or administer new stop-loss insurance policies in this state; provided, however, that the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) Notice of the decision to cease writing, issuing, or administering new or existing stop-loss insurance policies in
 this state is provided to the commissioner, and to the small employer, at least 180 days prior to the discontinuation of the coverage.

(2) Stop-loss insurance policies subject to this article shall not be canceled until 180 days after the date of the notice required under paragraph (1). During that time, the stop-loss insurer shall continue to comply with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.3.

A stop-loss insurance policy issued, reissued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2014, and prior to January 1, 2016, to a small employer shall not contain any of the following provisions:

(a) An individual attachment point for a policy year that is less than thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(b) An aggregate attachment point for a policy year that is less than the greater of one of the following:

(1) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) times the total number of group members.

(2) One hundred twenty percent of expected claims.

(3) Thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(c) A provision for direct coverage of an employee or dependent of an employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.4.

A stop-loss insurance policy issued, reissued, or renewed on or after January 1, 2016, to a small employer shall not contain any of the following provisions:

(a) An individual attachment point for a policy year that is less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

(b) An aggregate attachment point for a policy year that is less than the greater of one of the following:

(1) Five thousand dollars ($5,000) times the total number of group members.

(2) One hundred twenty percent of expected claims.

(3) Forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

(c) A provision for direct coverage of an employee or dependent of an employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.43.

Sections 10752.3 and 10752.4 do not apply to a stop-loss insurance policy provided to a small employer that was in effect prior to September 1, 2013. A stop-loss insurance policy that was in effect prior to September 1, 2013, may be renewed or reissued, or a stop-loss insurance policy may be issued by another stop-loss insurer to maintain continuity of stop-loss coverage for a small employer who had a stop-loss insurance policy in effect prior to September 1, 2013, provided that a stop-loss policy issued to maintain continuity of coverage shall have attachment points that are the same as or higher than the attachment points that were in place in the policy held by the small employer prior to September 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.46.

On April 1, 2014, and on April 1 annually thereafter, a stop-loss insurer shall report to the Department of Insurance the number of small employer stop-loss policies it had issued and in effect as of December 31 of the previous year. The information shall include new policies issued and policies reissued or renewed in the previous year for groups that have 1 to 50 employees and 51 to 100 employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.5.

The commissioner may adopt regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. In adopting regulations, the commissioner shall comply with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.6.

A stop-loss insurer that violates the provisions of this article is subject to the remedies and administrative penalties applicable to insurers in Sections 10718 and 10718.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.7.

Nothing in this article shall affect the ongoing operations of multiple employer welfare arrangements regulated pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 that provide health care benefits to their members on a self-funded or partially self-funded basis and that comply with small group health reforms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

10752.8.

The provisions of this article are severable. If any provision of this article or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 443, Sec. 1.   (SB 161)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.01. Nongrandfathered Small Employer Health Insurance [10753. - 10753.18.7.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [10753. - 10753.01.]

10753.

(a) “Agent or broker” means a person or entity licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2 of Division 1.

(b) “Benefit plan design” means a specific health coverage product issued by a carrier to small employers, to trustees of associations that include small employers, or to individuals if the coverage is offered through employment or sponsored by an employer. It includes services covered and the levels of copayment and deductibles, and it may include the professional providers who are to provide those services and the sites where those services are to be provided. A benefit plan design may also be an integrated system for the financing and delivery of quality health care services which has significant incentives for the covered individuals to
 use the system.

(c) “Carrier” means a health insurer or any other entity that writes, issues, or administers health benefit plans that cover the employees of small employers, regardless of the situs of the contract or master policyholder.

(d) “Child” means a child described in Section 22775 of the Government Code and subdivisions (n) to (p), inclusive, of Section 599.500 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations.

(e) “Dependent” means the spouse or registered domestic partner, or child, of an eligible employee, subject to applicable terms of the health benefit plan covering the employee, and includes dependents of guaranteed association members if the association elects to include dependents under its health coverage at the same time it determines its membership composition pursuant to subdivision (s).

(f) “Eligible employee” means either of the following:

(1) Any permanent employee who is actively engaged on a full-time basis in the conduct of the business of the small employer with a normal workweek of an average of 30 hours per week over the course of a month, in the small employer’s regular place of business, who has met any statutorily authorized applicable waiting period requirements. The term does not include sole proprietors or the spouses of those sole proprietors, partners of a partnership or the spouses of those partners, or employees who work on a part-time, temporary, or substitute basis. It includes any eligible employee, as defined in this paragraph, who obtains coverage through a guaranteed association. Employees of employers purchasing through a guaranteed association are eligible employees if they would otherwise meet the definition except for the number of
 persons employed by the employer. A permanent employee who works at least 20 hours but not more than 29 hours is an eligible employee if all four of the following apply:

(A) The employee otherwise meets the definition of an eligible employee except for the number of hours worked.

(B) The employer offers the employee health coverage under a health benefit plan.

(C) All similarly situated individuals are offered coverage under the health benefit plan.

(D) The employee shall have worked at least 20 hours per normal workweek for at least 50 percent of the weeks in the previous calendar quarter. The insurer may request any necessary information to document the hours and time period in question, including, but not limited to, payroll records and employee wage
 and tax filings.

(2) Any member of a guaranteed association as defined in subdivision (s).

(g) “Enrollee” means an eligible employee or dependent who receives health coverage through the program from a participating carrier.

(h) “Exchange” means the California Health Benefit Exchange created by Section 100500 of the Government Code.

(i) “Financially impaired” means, for the purposes of this chapter, a carrier that, on or after the effective date of this chapter, is not insolvent and is either:

(1) Deemed by the commissioner to be potentially unable to fulfill its contractual obligations.

(2) Placed under an order of
 rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(j) “Health benefit plan” means a policy of health insurance, as defined in Section 106, for the covered eligible employees of a small employer and their dependents. The term does not include coverage of Medicare services pursuant to contracts with the United States government, or coverage that provides excepted benefits, as described in Sections 2722 and 2791 of the federal Public Health Service Act, subject to Section 10701.

(k) “In force business” means an existing health benefit plan issued by the carrier to a small employer.

(l) “Late enrollee” means an eligible employee or dependent who has declined health coverage under a health benefit plan offered by a small employer at the time of the initial enrollment period provided under the terms of
 the health benefit plan consistent with the periods provided pursuant to Section 10753.05 and who subsequently requests enrollment in a health benefit plan of that small employer, except where the employee or dependent qualifies for a special enrollment period provided pursuant to Section 10753.05. It also means any member of an association that is a guaranteed association as well as any other person eligible to purchase through the guaranteed association when that person has failed to purchase coverage during the initial enrollment period provided under the terms of the guaranteed association’s health benefit plan consistent with the periods provided pursuant to Section 10753.05 and who subsequently requests enrollment in the plan, except where the employee or dependent qualifies for a special enrollment period provided pursuant to Section 10753.05.

(m) “New business” means a health benefit plan issued to a small employer that is not the
 carrier’s in force business.

(n) “Preexisting condition provision” means a policy provision that excludes coverage for charges or expenses incurred during a specified period following the insured’s effective date of coverage, as to a condition for which medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was recommended or received during a specified period immediately preceding the effective date of coverage.

(o) “Creditable coverage” means:

(1) Any individual or group policy, contract, or program, that is written or administered by a health insurer, health care service plan, fraternal benefits society, self-insured employer plan, or any other entity, in this state or elsewhere, and that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans. The term
 includes continuation or conversion coverage but does not include accident only, credit, coverage for onsite medical clinics, disability income, Medicare supplement, long-term care, dental, vision, coverage issued as a supplement to liability insurance, insurance arising out of a workers’ compensation or similar law, automobile medical payment insurance, or insurance under which benefits are payable with or without regard to fault and that is statutorily required to be contained in any liability insurance policy or equivalent self-insurance.

(2) The federal Medicare Program pursuant to Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395 et seq.).

(3) The Medicaid program pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(4) Any other publicly sponsored program,
 provided in this state or elsewhere, of medical, hospital, and surgical care.

(5) Chapter 55 (commencing with Section 1071) of Title 10 of the United States Code (Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS)).

(6) A medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal organization.

(7) A health plan offered under Chapter 89 (commencing with Section 8901) of Title 5 of the United States Code (Federal Employees Health Benefits Program (FEHBP)).

(8) A public health plan as defined in federal regulations authorized by Section 2701(c)(1)(I) of the federal Public Health Service Act, as amended by Public Law 104-191, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996.

(9) A health benefit plan under Section 5(e) of the federal Peace Corps Act (22 U.S.C. Sec. 2504(e)).

(10) Any other creditable coverage as defined by subdivision (c) of Section 2704 of Title XXVII of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg-3(c)).

(p) “Rating period” means the period for which premium rates established by a carrier are in effect and shall be no less than 12 months from the date of issuance or renewal of the health benefit plan.

(q) (1) “Small employer” means either of the following:

(A) For plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2014, and on or before December 31, 2015, any person, firm, proprietary or nonprofit corporation,
 partnership, public agency, or association that is actively engaged in business or service, that, on at least 50 percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter or preceding calendar year, employed at least one, but no more than 50, eligible employees, the majority of whom were employed within this state, that was not formed primarily for purposes of buying health benefit plans, and in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship exists. For plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2016, any person, firm, proprietary or nonprofit corporation, partnership, public agency, or association that is actively engaged in business or service, that, on at least 50 percent of its working days during the preceding calendar quarter or preceding calendar year, employed at least one, but no more than 100, employees, the majority of whom were employed within this state, that was not formed primarily for purposes of buying health benefit plans, and in which a bona fide employer-employee relationship
 exists. In determining whether to apply the calendar quarter or calendar year test, a carrier shall use the test that ensures eligibility if only one test would establish eligibility. In determining the number of employees or eligible employees, companies that are affiliated companies and that are eligible to file a combined tax return for purposes of state taxation shall be considered one employer. Subsequent to the issuance of a health benefit plan to a small employer pursuant to this chapter, and for the purpose of determining eligibility, the size of a small employer shall be determined annually. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, provisions of this chapter that apply to a small employer shall continue to apply until the plan contract anniversary following the date the employer no longer meets the requirements of this definition. It includes any small employer as defined in this subparagraph who purchases coverage through a guaranteed association, any employer purchasing coverage
 for employees through a guaranteed association, and any small employer as defined in this paragraph who purchases coverage through any arrangement, but does not include multiple employer welfare arrangements regulated pursuant to Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 742.20) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 that provide health care benefits to their members on a self-funded or partially self-funded basis and that comply with small group health reforms.

(B) Any guaranteed association, as defined in subdivision (r), that purchases health coverage for members of the association.

(2) For plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2019, for purposes of determining whether an employer has one employee, sole proprietors and their spouses, and partners of a partnership and their spouses, are not employees.

(3) For plan
 years commencing on or after January 1, 2016, the definition of small employer, for purposes of determining employer eligibility in the small employer market, shall be determined using the method for counting full-time employees and full-time equivalent employees set forth in Section 4980H(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(r) “Guaranteed association” means a nonprofit organization comprised of a group of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, accepting for membership any individual or employer meeting its membership criteria which (1) includes one or more small employers as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (q), (2) does not condition membership directly or indirectly on the health or claims history of any person, (3) uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues
 shall not depend on whether the member applies for or purchases insurance offered by the association, (4) is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance, (5) has been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date, (6) has been offering health insurance to its members for at least five years prior to January 1, 1992, (7) has a constitution and bylaws, or other analogous governing documents that provide for election of the governing board of the association by its members, (8) offers any benefit plan design that is purchased to all individual members and employer members in this state, (9) includes any member choosing to enroll in the benefit plan design offered to the association provided that the member has agreed to make the required premium payments, and (10) covers at least 1,000 persons with the carrier with which it contracts. The requirement of 1,000 persons may be met if component chapters of a statewide association contracting
 separately with the same carrier cover at least 1,000 persons in the aggregate.

This subdivision applies regardless of whether a master policy by an admitted insurer is delivered directly to the association or a trust formed for or sponsored by an association to administer benefits for association members.

For purposes of this subdivision, an association formed by a merger of two or more associations after January 1, 1992, and otherwise meeting the criteria of this subdivision shall be deemed to have been in active existence on January 1, 1992, if its predecessor organizations had been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date and otherwise met the criteria of this subdivision.

(s) “Members of a guaranteed association” means any individual or employer meeting the association’s membership criteria if that person is a
 member of the association and chooses to purchase health coverage through the association. At the association’s discretion, it may also include employees of association members, association staff, retired members, retired employees of members, and surviving spouses and dependents of deceased members. However, if an association chooses to include those persons as members of the guaranteed association, the association must so elect in advance of purchasing coverage from a plan. Health plans may require an association to adhere to the membership composition it selects for up to 12 months.

(t) “Grandfathered health plan” has the meaning set forth in Section 1251 of PPACA.

(u) “Nongrandfathered health benefit plan” means a health benefit plan that is not a grandfathered health plan.

(v) “Plan year” has the meaning set
 forth in Section 144.103 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(w) “PPACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), and any rules, regulations, or guidance issued thereunder.

(x) “Waiting period” means a period that is required to pass with respect to the employee before the employee is eligible to be covered for benefits under the terms of the contract.

(y) “Registered domestic partner” means a person who has established a domestic partnership as described in Section 297 of the Family Code.

(z) “Family” means the policyholder and his or her dependents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 700, Sec. 8.   (SB 1375)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.01.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “health benefit plan” does not include policies or certificates of specified disease or hospital confinement indemnity provided that the carrier offering those policies or certificates complies with the following:

(1) The carrier files, on or before March 1 of each year, a certification with the commissioner that contains the statement and information described in paragraph (2).

(2) The certification required in paragraph (1) shall contain the
 following:

(A) A statement from the carrier certifying that policies or certificates described in this section (i) are being offered and marketed as supplemental health insurance and not as a substitute for coverage that provides essential health benefits as defined by the state pursuant to Section 1302 of PPACA, and (ii) the disclosure forms as described in Section 10603 contains the following statement prominently on the first page: “This is a supplement to health insurance. It is not a substitute for essential health benefits or minimum essential coverage as defined in federal law.”

(B) A summary description of each policy or certificate described in this section, including the average annual premium rates, or range of premium rates in cases where premiums vary by age, gender, or other factors, charged for the policies and certificates issued or delivered in this state.

(3) In the case of a policy or certificate that is described in this section and that is offered for the first time in this state with respect to plan years on or after January 1, 2014, the carrier files with the commissioner the information and
 statement required in paragraph (2) at least 30 days prior to the date such a policy or certificate is issued or delivered in this state.

(b) As used in this section, “policies or certificates of specified disease” and “policies or certificates of hospital confinement indemnity” mean policies or certificates of insurance sold to an insured to supplement other health insurance coverage as specified in this section. An insurer issuing a “policy or certificate of specified disease” or a “policy or certificate of hospital confinement indemnity” shall require that the person to be insured is covered by an individual or group policy or contract that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 14.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Small Employer Carrier Requirements [10753.02. - 10753.18.7.]

10753.02.

(a) This chapter shall apply only to nongrandfathered health benefit plans and only with respect to plan years commencing on or after January 1, 2014.

(b) All carriers writing, issuing, or administering health benefit plans that cover employees of small employers shall be subject to this chapter if any one of the following conditions are met:

(1) Any portion of the premium for any health benefit plan or benefits is paid by a small employer, or any covered individual is reimbursed,
 whether through wage adjustments or otherwise, by a small employer for any portion of the premium.

(2) The health benefit plan is treated by the small employer or any of the covered individuals as part of a plan or program for the purposes of Section 106 or 162 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 14.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.02.1.

Any person or entity subject to the requirements of this chapter shall comply with the standards set forth in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3750) of Part 1 of Division 9 of the Family Code and Section 14124.94 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 14.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.03.

The commissioner shall have the authority to determine whether a health benefit plan is covered by this chapter, and to determine whether an employer is a small employer within the meaning of Section 10753.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 14.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.04.

The commissioner may issue regulations that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 852, Sec. 14.   (AB 1083)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

10753.05.

(a) A group or individual policy or contract or certificate of group insurance or statement of group coverage providing benefits to employees of small employers as defined in this chapter shall not be issued or delivered by a carrier subject to the jurisdiction of the commissioner regardless of the situs of the contract or master policyholder or of the domicile of the carrier nor, except as otherwise provided in Sections 10270.91 and 10270.92, shall a carrier provide coverage subject to this chapter until a copy of the form of the policy, contract, certificate, or statement of coverage is filed with and approved by the commissioner in accordance with Sections 10290 and 10291, and the carrier has complied with the requirements of Section
 10753.17.

(b) (1) Each carrier shall fairly and affirmatively offer, market, and sell all of the carrier’s health benefit plans that are sold to, offered through, or sponsored by, small employers or associations that include small employers for plan years on or after January 1, 2014, to all small employers in each geographic region in which the carrier makes coverage available or provides benefits.

(2) A carrier that offers qualified health plans through the Exchange shall be deemed to be in compliance with paragraph (1) with respect to health benefit plans offered through the Exchange in those geographic regions in which the carrier offers plans through the Exchange.

(3) A carrier shall provide
 enrollment periods consistent with PPACA and described in Section 155.725 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations. Commencing January 1, 2014, a carrier shall provide special enrollment periods consistent with the special enrollment periods described in Section 10965.3, to the extent permitted by PPACA, except for both of the following:

(A) The special enrollment period described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 10965.3.

(B) The triggering events identified in paragraphs (d)(3) and (d)(6) of Section 155.420 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations with respect to health benefit plans offered through the Exchange.

(4) This section does not require an association, or a trust established and
 maintained by an association to receive a master insurance policy issued by an admitted insurer and to administer the benefits thereof solely for association members, to offer, market, or sell a benefit plan design to those who are not members of the association. However, if the association markets, offers, or sells a benefit plan design to those who are not members of the association it is subject to the requirements of this section. This section applies to an association that otherwise meets the requirements of paragraph (8) formed by merger of two or more associations after January 1, 1992, if the predecessor organizations had been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and for at least five years prior to that date and met the requirements of paragraph (5).

(5) A carrier which (A) effective January 1, 1992, and at least 20 years
 prior to that date, markets, offers, or sells benefit plan designs only to all members of one association and (B) does not market, offer, or sell any other individual, selected group, or group policy or contract providing medical, hospital, and surgical benefits shall not be required to market, offer, or sell to those who are not members of the association. However, if the carrier markets, offers, or sells any benefit plan design or any other individual, selected group, or group policy or contract providing medical, hospital, and surgical benefits to those who are not members of the association it is subject to the requirements of this section.

(6) Each carrier that sells health benefit plans to members of one association pursuant to paragraph (5) shall submit an annual statement to the commissioner which states that the carrier is selling health
 benefit plans pursuant to paragraph (5) and which, for the one association, lists all the information required by paragraph (7).

(7) Each carrier that sells health benefit plans to members of any association shall submit an annual statement to the commissioner which lists each association to which the carrier sells health benefit plans, the industry or profession which is served by the association, the association’s membership criteria, a list of officers, the state in which the association is organized, and the site of its principal office.

(8) For purposes of paragraphs (4) and (6), an association is a nonprofit organization composed of a group of individuals or employers who associate based solely on participation in a specified profession or industry, accepting for membership any individual
 or small employer meeting its membership criteria, which do not condition membership directly or indirectly on the health or claims history of any person, which uses membership dues solely for and in consideration of the membership and membership benefits, except that the amount of the dues shall not depend on whether the member applies for or purchases insurance offered by the association, which is organized and maintained in good faith for purposes unrelated to insurance, which has been in active existence on January 1, 1992, and at least five years prior to that date, which has a constitution and bylaws, or other analogous governing documents that provide for election of the governing board of the association by its members, which has contracted with one or more carriers to offer one or more health benefit plans to all individual members and small employer members in this state.

(A) Health coverage through an association that is not related to employment shall be considered individual coverage. The status of each distinct member of an association shall determine whether that member’s association coverage is individual, small group, or large group health insurance coverage.

(B) (i) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (C), an association of employers may offer a large group health insurance policy consistent with the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-406) (ERISA), as amended (29 U.S.C.
 Sec. 1001 et seq.), if all of the following requirements are met:

(I) The association is headquartered in this state and is a multiple employer welfare arrangement (MEWA) as defined under Section 3(40) of ERISA (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002(40)).

(II) The MEWA is fully insured as described in Section 514 of ERISA (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1144) and is a bona fide association or group of employers that may act as an “employer” under Section 3(5) of ERISA.

(III) The MEWA was established prior to March 23, 2010, and has been in continuous existence since that date, and offers a large group health insurance policy in connection with an employee welfare benefit plan under Section 3(1) of ERISA (29 U.S.C. Sec. 1002(1)).

(IV) As of January 1, 2019, the large group health insurance policy offered to employees has continuously provided a level of coverage having an actuarial value equivalent to, or greater than, the platinum level of coverage, as described in Section 10112.295, that is available through the California Health Benefit Exchange established pursuant to Section 100500 of the Government Code, and the large group health insurance policy provides coverage for essential health benefits consistent with Section 10112.27 and any rules or regulations adopted pursuant to that section.

(V) The large group health insurance policy includes coverage of employees, and their dependents, who are employed in designated job categories on a project-by-project basis for one or more participating employers,
 with no single project exceeding six months in duration, and who, in the course of that employment, are not covered by another group health insurance policy in which the employer participates. Employer members of the MEWA shall subsidize at least 51 percent of the cost of individual employee premiums of their employees.
